Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 4921.
Eligibility for licensure by examination as an applied behavior analyst.

To be eligible for licensure as an applied behavior analyst, an applicant shall:

Obtain a doctoral or master’s degree from a recognized educational program accredited by the Association for Behavior Analysis International Accreditation Board, or from a program at a recognized educational institution that is approved by the Director and that substantially meets the educational standards of the Association for Behavior Analysis International Accreditation Board or the Behavior Analysis Certification Board. Any program shall include an approved course sequence of the Behavior Analyst Certification Board.

Successfully complete an approved practicum or supervised experience in the practice of applied behavior analysis, totaling at least 1,500 hours over a period of not less than one calendar year, of which at least 75 hours are in direct one-to-one contact with a supervisor.

Successfully complete, as defined by the Director, a nationally recognized examination adopted from the Behavior Analyst Certification Board and approved by the Director, related to the principles and practice of applied behavior analysis. This subdivision (3) shall not be construed to require the Director to develop or administer any examination.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4922.
Eligibility for licensure by examination as an assistant behavior analyst.

To be eligible for licensure as an assistant behavior analyst, an applicant shall:

Obtain a bachelor’s degree from a program at a recognized educational institution that is approved by the Director and that substantially meets the educational standards of the Association for Behavior Analysis International Accreditation Board or the Behavior Analysis Certification Board. Any program shall include an approved course sequence of the Behavior Analyst Certification Board.

Successfully complete an approved practicum or supervised experience in the practice of applied behavior analysis, totaling at least 1,000 hours over a period of not less than one calendar year, of which at least 50 hours are in direct one-to-one contact with a supervisor.

Successfully complete, as defined by the Director, a nationally recognized examination adopted from the Behavior Analyst Certification Board and approved by the Director, related to the principles and practice of applied behavior analysis. This subdivision (3) shall not be construed to require the Director to develop or administer any examination.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4923.
Licensure by endorsement.

A person may be licensed under this chapter if he or she:

possesses a valid registration or license to engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis issued by the appropriate regulatory authority of a state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, based on requirements and qualifications shown by the application to be equal to or greater than the requirements of this chapter; or
(1) (A) possesses a valid registration or license to engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis issued by the appropriate regulatory authority of a state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, based on requirements and qualifications shown by the application to be equal to or greater than the requirements of this chapter; or

is certified as a board certified behavior analyst by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board; and

meets any active practice requirements established by the Director by rule.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4924.
Issuance of licenses.

The Director shall issue a license, upon payment of the fees prescribed in this chapter, to any applicant who has satisfactorily met all the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4925.
Renewals.

Licenses shall be renewed every two years, on a schedule determined by the Director, upon payment of the renewal fee.

Biennially, the Director shall provide notice to each licensee of license expiration and renewal requirements. Upon receipt of a complete and satisfactory renewal application and fee, the Director shall issue a new license.

As a condition of renewal, the Director may by rule require that a licensee establish that he or she has completed continuing education. The Director may accept proof of current certification from the Behavior Analyst Certification Board as evidence of continuing competency if the Director finds that the maintenance of such certification implies appropriate continuing education.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016; amended

2019, No. 30

, § 25.

§ 4926.
License and renewal fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay those fees set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 125(b)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4927.
Applications.

The Director shall promulgate applications for licensure and license renewal. Each application shall contain a statement under oath showing the applicant’s education, experience, and other pertinent information and shall be accompanied by the required fee.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016; amended

2019, No. 30

, § 25.

§ 4928.
Scope of practice of applied behavior analysts.

A person licensed under this chapter shall only engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis upon, and within the scope of, a referral from a licensed health professional or school official duly authorized to make such a referral.

The practice of applied behavior analysis shall not include psychological testing, neuropsychology, diagnosis of mental health or developmental conditions, psychotherapy, cognitive therapy, sex therapy, psychoanalysis, psychopharmacological recommendations, hypnotherapy, or academic teaching by college or university faculty.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4929.
Supervision of assistant behavior analysts.

An assistant behavior analyst shall only engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis if he or she has a minimum of five hours per month of off-site case supervision by an applied behavior analyst. A supervising applied behavior analyst may require that his or her supervision of an assistant behavior analyst exceed the minimum requirements of this section, including the requirement that the supervision be on-site.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4930.
Disclosure of information.

The Director may adopt rules requiring a person licensed under this chapter to disclose the licensee’s professional qualifications and experience, those actions that constitute unprofessional conduct, and the method for filing a complaint or making a consumer inquiry, and the manner in which that information shall be made available and to whom.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 4931.
Unprofessional conduct.

Unprofessional conduct means the following conduct and the conduct set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

, committed by a licensee, an applicant, or a person who later becomes an applicant:

making or causing to be made a false, fraudulent, or forged statement or representation in procuring or attempting to procure licensure or renew a license to practice under this chapter;

using dishonest or misleading advertising;

misusing a title in professional activity;

engaging in any sexual conduct with a client, or with the immediate family member of a client, with whom the licensee has had a professional relationship within the previous five years;

harassing, intimidating, or abusing a client;

entering into an additional relationship with a client, supervisee, research participant, or student that might impair the person’s objectivity or otherwise interfere with a licensee’s obligations;

practicing outside or beyond a licensee’s area of training, experience, or competence;

being or having been convicted of a misdemeanor related to the practice of applied behavior analysis or a felony;

being unable to practice applied behavior analysis competently by reason of any cause;

willfully or repeatedly violating any of the provisions of this chapter;

being habitually intemperate or addicted to the use of habit-forming drugs;

having a mental, emotional, or physical disability, the nature of which interferes with the ability to practice applied behavior analysis competently;

engaging in conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud, or harm the public, including exposing clients to unjustifiably degrading or cruel interventions or implementing therapies not supported by a competent clinical rationale; or

failing to notify the Director in writing within ten days of the loss, revocation, discontinuation, or invalidation of any certification or degree offered to support eligibility for licensure or to demonstrate continuing competency.

A person shall not be liable in a civil action for damages resulting from the good faith reporting of information to the Director or the Office of Professional Regulation about alleged incompetent, unprofessional, or unlawful conduct of a person licensed under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 38

, § 46, eff. July 1, 2016.